California statutes. Labor Code
 other law, as used in this section, “employee” includes a domestic work employee, except for a person who performs household domestic service that is publicly funded, including publicly funded household domestic service provided to a recipient, client, or beneficiary with a share of cost in that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 288, Sec. 4.   (AB 2658)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Responsibilities and Duties of Employers and Employees [6400. - 6413.5.]

6400.

(a) Every employer shall furnish employment and a place of employment that is safe and healthful for the employees therein.

(b) On multiemployer worksites, both construction and nonconstruction, citations may be issued only to the following categories of employers when the division has evidence that an employee was exposed to a hazard in violation of any requirement enforceable by the division:

(1) The employer whose
 employees were exposed to the hazard (the exposing employer).

(2) The employer who actually created the hazard (the creating employer).

(3) The employer who was responsible, by contract or through actual practice, for safety and health conditions on the worksite, which is the employer who had the authority for ensuring that the hazardous condition is corrected (the controlling employer).

(4) The employer who had the responsibility for actually correcting the hazard (the correcting employer).

The employers listed in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of this subdivision may be cited regardless of whether their own employees were exposed to the hazard.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, in adding subdivision
 (b) to this section, to codify existing regulations with respect to the responsibility of employers at multiemployer worksites. Subdivision (b) of this section is declaratory of existing law and shall not be construed or interpreted as creating a new law or as modifying or changing an existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 615, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

Every employer shall furnish and use safety devices and safeguards, and shall adopt and use practices, means, methods, operations, and processes which are reasonably adequate to render such employment and place of employment safe and healthful. Every employer shall do every other thing reasonably necessary to protect the life, safety, and health of employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.5.

No salvage of materials shall be permitted while demolition is in progress on any building, structure, falsework, or scaffold more than three stories high or the equivalent height for which a permit is required under subdivision (c) of Section 6500.

For this purpose salvage does not include removal of material from premises solely for the purpose of clearing the area to facilitate the continuation of the demolition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.7.

(a) Every employer shall establish, implement, and maintain an effective injury prevention program. The program shall be written, except as provided in subdivision (e), and shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the person or persons responsible for implementing the program.

(2) The employer’s system for identifying and evaluating workplace hazards, including scheduled periodic inspections to identify unsafe conditions and work practices.

(3) The employer’s methods and procedures for correcting unsafe or unhealthy
 conditions and work practices in a timely manner.

(4) An occupational health and safety training program designed to instruct employees in general safe and healthy work practices and to provide specific instruction with respect to hazards specific to each employee’s job assignment.

(5) The employer’s system for communicating with employees on occupational health and safety matters, including provisions designed to encourage employees to inform the employer of hazards at the worksite without fear of reprisal.

(6) The employer’s system for ensuring that employees comply with safe and healthy work practices, which may include disciplinary action.

(7) A
 workplace violence prevention plan conforming to the requirements of Section 6401.9.

(b) The employer shall correct unsafe and unhealthy conditions and work practices in a timely manner based on the severity of the hazard.

(c) The employer shall train all employees when the training program is first established, all new employees, and all employees given a new job assignment, and shall train employees whenever new substances, processes, procedures, or equipment are introduced to the workplace and represent a new hazard, and whenever the employer receives notification of a new or previously unrecognized hazard. An employer in the construction industry who is required to be licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions
 Code may use employee training provided to the employer’s employees under a construction industry occupational safety and health training program approved by the division to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) relating to employee training, and shall only be required to provide training on hazards specific to an employee’s job duties.

(d) The employer shall keep appropriate records of steps taken to implement and maintain the program. An employer in the construction industry who is required to be licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code may use records relating to employee training provided to the employer in connection with an occupational safety and health training program approved by the division to comply with this subdivision, and shall only be required to
 keep records of those steps taken to implement and maintain the program with respect to hazards specific to an employee’s job duties.

(e) (1) The standards board shall adopt a standard setting forth the employer’s duties under this section, on or before January 1, 1991, consistent with the requirements specified in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d). The standards board, in adopting the standard, shall include substantial compliance criteria for use in evaluating an employer’s injury prevention program. The board may adopt less stringent criteria for employers with few employees and for employers in industries with insignificant occupational safety or health hazards.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for employers with fewer than 20 employees who are in
 industries that are not on a designated list of high hazard industries and who have a workers’ compensation experience modification rate of 1.1 or less, and for any employers with fewer than 20 employees who are in industries that are on a designated list of low hazard industries, the board shall adopt a standard setting forth the employer’s duties under this section consistent with the requirements specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), except that the standard shall only require written documentation to the extent of documenting the person or persons responsible for implementing the program pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), keeping a record of periodic inspections pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and keeping a record of employee training pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a). To any extent beyond the specifications of this subdivision, the standard shall
 not require the employer to keep the records specified in subdivision (d).

(3) (A) The division shall establish a list of high hazard industries using the methods prescribed in Section 6314.1 for identifying and targeting employers in high hazard industries. For purposes of this subdivision, the “designated list of high hazard industries” shall be the list established pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) For the purpose of implementing this subdivision, the Department of Industrial Relations shall periodically review, and as necessary revise, the list.

(4) For the purpose of implementing this subdivision, the Department of Industrial Relations shall also establish a list of low hazard industries, and shall
 periodically review, and as necessary revise, that list.

(f) The standard adopted pursuant to subdivision (e) shall specifically permit employer and employee occupational safety and health committees to be included in the employer’s injury prevention program. The board shall establish criteria for use in evaluating employer and employee occupational safety and health committees. The criteria shall include minimum duties, including the following:

(1) Review of the employer’s periodic, scheduled worksite inspections; investigation of causes of incidents resulting in injury, illness, or exposure to hazardous substances; and investigation of any alleged hazardous condition brought to the attention of any committee member. When determined necessary by the committee, the
 committee may conduct its own inspections and investigations.

(2) (A) Upon request from the division, verification of abatement action taken by the employer as specified in division citations.

(B) If an employer’s occupational safety and health committee meets the criteria established by the board, it shall be presumed to be in substantial compliance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(g) The division shall adopt regulations specifying the procedures for selecting employee representatives for employer-employee occupational health and safety committees when these procedures are not specified in an applicable collective bargaining agreement. No employee or employee organization shall be held
 liable for any act or omission in connection with a health and safety committee.

(h) The employer’s injury prevention program, as required by this section, shall cover all of the employer’s employees and all other workers who the employer controls or directs and directly supervises on the job to the extent these workers are exposed to worksite and job assignment specific hazards. Nothing in this subdivision shall affect the obligations of a contractor or other employer that controls or directs and directly supervises its own employees on the job.

(i) When a contractor supplies its employee to a state agency employer on a temporary basis, the state agency employer may assess a fee upon the contractor to reimburse the state agency for the additional costs, if any, of including the
 contract employee within the state agency’s injury prevention program.

(j) (1) The division shall prepare a Model Injury and Illness Prevention Program for Non-High-Hazard Employment, and shall make copies of the model program prepared pursuant to this subdivision available to employers, upon request, for posting in the workplace. An employer who adopts and implements the model program prepared by the division pursuant to this paragraph in good faith shall not be assessed a civil penalty for the first citation for a violation of this section issued after the employer’s adoption and implementation of the model program.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the division shall establish a list of non-high-hazard industries in California. These industries, identified
 by their Standard Industrial Classification Codes, as published by the United States Office of Management and Budget in the Manual of Standard Industrial Classification Codes, 1987 Edition, are apparel and accessory stores (Code 56), eating and drinking places (Code 58), miscellaneous retail (Code 59), finance, insurance, and real estate (Codes 60–67), personal services (Code 72), business services (Code 73), motion pictures (Code 78) except motion picture production and allied services (Code 781), legal services (Code 81), educational services (Code 82), social services (Code 83), museums, art galleries, and botanical and zoological gardens (Code 84), membership organizations (Code 86), engineering, accounting, research, management, and related services (Code 87), private households (Code 88), and miscellaneous services (Code 89). To further identify industries that may be included on the list,
 the division shall also consider data from a rating organization, as defined in Section 11750.1 of the Insurance Code, and all other appropriate information. The list shall be established by June 30, 1994, and shall be reviewed, and as necessary revised, biennially.

(3) The division shall prepare a Model Injury and Illness Prevention Program for Employers with Seasonal or Intermittent Workers, and shall determine which industries have historically utilized seasonal or intermittent employees. An employer in an industry determined by the division to have historically utilized seasonal or intermittent employees shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of subdivision (a) with respect to a written injury prevention program if the employer adopts the model program prepared by the division pursuant to this paragraph and complies
 with any instructions relating thereto.

(k) With respect to any county, city, city and county, or district, or any public or quasi-public corporation or public agency therein, including any public entity, other than a state agency, that is a member of, or created by, a joint powers agreement, subdivision (d) shall not apply.

(l) Every workers’ compensation insurer shall conduct a review, including a written report as specified below, of the injury and illness prevention program (IIPP) of each of its insureds with an experience modification of 2.0 or greater within six months of the commencement of the initial insurance policy term. The review shall determine whether the insured has implemented all of the required components of the IIPP, and evaluate their effectiveness. The
 training component of the IIPP shall be evaluated to determine whether training is provided to line employees, supervisors, and upper level management, and effectively imparts the information and skills each of these groups needs to ensure that all of the insured’s specific health and safety issues are fully addressed by the insured. The reviewer shall prepare a detailed written report specifying the findings of the review and all recommended changes deemed necessary to make the IIPP effective. The reviewer shall be or work under the direction of a licensed California professional engineer, certified safety professional, or a certified industrial hygienist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 100.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.8.

(a) The standards board, no later than July 1, 2016, shall adopt standards developed by the division that require a hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, except as exempted by subdivision (e), to adopt a workplace violence prevention plan as a part of its injury and illness prevention plan to protect health care workers and other facility personnel from aggressive and violent behavior.

(b) The standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) A requirement that the workplace violence prevention plan be in effect at
 all times in all patient care units, including inpatient and outpatient settings and clinics on the hospital’s license.

(2) A definition of workplace violence that includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(A) The use of physical force against a hospital employee by a patient or a person accompanying a patient that results in, or has a high likelihood of resulting in, injury, psychological trauma, or stress, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury.

(B) An incident involving the use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury.

(3) A requirement that a workplace violence prevention plan include,
 but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Personnel education and training policies that require all health care workers who provide direct care to patients to, at least annually, receive education and training that is designed to provide an opportunity for interactive questions and answers with a person knowledgeable about the workplace violence prevention plan. The education and training shall cover topics that include, but are not limited to, the following topics:

(i) How to recognize potential for violence, and when and how to seek assistance to prevent or respond to violence.

(ii) How to report violent incidents to law enforcement.

(iii) Any resources
 available to employees for coping with incidents of violence, including, but not limited to, critical incident stress debriefing or employee assistance programs.

(B) A system for responding to, and investigating violent incidents and situations involving violence or the risk of violence.

(C) A system to, at least annually, assess and improve upon factors that may contribute to, or help prevent workplace violence, including, but not limited to, the following factors:

(i) Staffing, including staffing patterns and patient classification systems that contribute to, or are insufficient to address, the risk of violence.

(ii) Sufficiency of security systems, including alarms,
 emergency response, and security personnel availability.

(iii) Job design, equipment, and facilities.

(iv) Security risks associated with specific units, areas of the facility with uncontrolled access, late-night or early morning shifts, and employee security in areas surrounding the facility such as employee parking areas.

(4) A requirement that all workplace violence prevention plans be developed in conjunction with affected employees, including their recognized collective bargaining agents, if any.

(5) A requirement that all temporary personnel be oriented to the workplace violence prevention plan.

(6) Provisions prohibiting hospitals from disallowing an employee from, or taking punitive or retaliatory action against an employee for, seeking assistance and intervention from local emergency services or law enforcement when a violent incident occurs.

(7) A requirement that hospitals document, and retain for a period of five years, a written record of any violent incident against a hospital employee, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury, and regardless of whether the report is made by the employee who is the subject of the violent incident or any other employee.

(8) A requirement that a hospital report violent incidents to the division. If the incident results in injury, involves the use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon, or presents an
 urgent or emergent threat to the welfare, health, or safety of hospital personnel, the hospital shall report the incident to the division within 24 hours. All other incidents of violence shall be reported to the division within 72 hours.

(c) The standards board shall, by March 1, 2027, amend the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) to include all of the following:

(1) (A) A requirement that a hospital implement a weapons detection screening policy that requires the use of weapons detection devices that automatically screen a person’s body, as described in clause (iii), at the hospital’s main public entrance, at the entrance to the hospital’s emergency department, and at the hospital’s labor and delivery entrance if separately accessible to the
 public.

(i) For purposes of this paragraph, a weapons detection screening policy shall include security mechanisms, devices, or technology designed to screen and identify instruments capable of inflicting death or serious bodily injury.

(ii) The use of handheld metal detector wands, while they may be used in connection with other weapons detection devices, may not be the sole equipment used. This clause does not apply to the following:

(I) Small and rural hospitals.

(II) Entrances with existing spacing limitations where the use of a weapons detection device other than a handheld metal detector wand would result in a violation of the standards in Title 24 of
 the California Code of Regulations.

(III) Hospitals that exclusively provide extended hospital care to patients with complex medical and rehabilitative needs, such as hospitals that are currently federally certified as long-term care hospitals or inpatient rehabilitation facilities.

(iii) The standards board shall define the list of applicable security mechanisms, devices, or technologies that meet the standard in this subparagraph.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions shall apply:

(i) “Main public entrance” means a singular entrance, as designated by the hospital, that serves as the primary point of access that patients and
 visitors use to enter the main hospital building.

(ii) “Small and rural hospital” has the same meaning as in subdivision (d) of Section 130076 of the Health and Safety Code for purposes of the Small and Rural Hospital Relief Program.

(C) The requirement described in this paragraph may not apply to the ambulance entrance.

(2) (A) A requirement that a hospital assign appropriate personnel, other than a health care provider, who meet training standards described in subparagraph (C), to implement the weapon detection screening policy, including the monitoring and operation of the weapons detection devices at each specified public entrance at all times the entrance is open to the public.

(B) A “health care provider” includes any health care professional licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) (i) A hospital shall implement training for personnel responsible for implementing the weapons detection screening policy that includes a minimum of eight hours of training on all of the following:

(I) The hospital’s policies and procedures on how to respond if a dangerous weapon is detected at the point of screening.

(II) How to operate the hospital’s weapons detection devices.

(III) De-escalation.

(IV) Implicit bias.

(ii) A hospital shall determine how the training described in this subparagraph is satisfied. The training topics described in clause (i) may be satisfied individually and on separate occasions or through one comprehensive training course, provided that the total amount of training received meets the minimum amount of time required in this subparagraph.

(D) No one other than trained personnel who have completed the requirements in subparagraph (C) shall search personal belongings at any hospital entrance or confiscate weapons if the hospital’s policies include weapons confiscation by trained personnel.

(3) (A) A
 provision permitting a hospital to exclude current hospital employees or health care providers who enter a hospital wearing an identification badge bearing their name and title from undergoing weapons detection screening as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(B) A requirement that the weapons detection screening policy include reasonable protocols addressing how the hospital will respond if a dangerous weapon is detected and reasonable protocols for alternative search and screening for patients, family, or visitors who refuse to undergo weapons detection device screening.

(C) If an individual triggers the weapons detection device, the individual shall have the right to leave the facility with the object and the right to return without the object and
 without being denied entry to the facility solely for the reason of previously possessing the detected object.

(4) A requirement that a hospital post, in a conspicuous location in a size and manner determined by the standards board, within reasonable proximity of any public entrances where weapons detection devices are utilized, a notice advising the public that the hospital conducts screenings for weapons upon entry but that no person shall be refused medical care, pursuant to the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act (EMTALA).

(5) The division shall set an effective date that is no longer than 90 days after the standard is adopted for hospitals to comply with the requirements of this subdivision.

(d) By January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the division,
 in a manner that protects patient and employee confidentiality, shall post a report on its internet website containing information regarding violent incidents at hospitals, that includes, but is not limited to, the total number of reports, and which specific hospitals filed reports, pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (b), the outcome of any related inspection or investigation, the citations levied against a hospital based on a violent incident, and recommendations of the division on the prevention of violent incidents at hospitals.

(e) This section shall not apply to a hospital operated by the State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Developmental Services, or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(f) This section does not
 limit the authority of the standards board to adopt standards to protect employees from workplace violence. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to preclude the standards board from adopting standards that require other employers, including, but not limited to, employers exempted from this section by subdivision (e), to adopt plans to protect employees from workplace violence. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to preclude the standards board from adopting standards that require an employer subject to this section, or any other employer, to adopt a workplace violence prevention plan that includes elements or requirements additional to, or broader in scope than, those described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 22.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Emergency” means unanticipated circumstances that can be life threatening or pose a risk of significant injuries to employees or other persons.

(2) “Engineering controls” mean an aspect of the built space or a device that removes a hazard from the workplace or creates a barrier between the worker and the hazard.

(3) “Log” means the violent incident log required by this section.

(4) “Plan” means the workplace violence prevention plan required by this section.

(5) “Threat of violence” means any verbal or written statement, including, but not limited to, texts, electronic messages, social media messages, or other online posts, or any behavioral or physical conduct, that conveys an intent, or that is reasonably perceived to convey an intent, to cause physical harm or to place someone in fear of physical harm, and that serves no legitimate purpose.

(6) (A) “Workplace violence” means any act of violence or threat of violence that occurs in a place of employment.

(B) “Workplace violence” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) The threat or use of physical force against an employee that results in, or has a high likelihood of resulting in, injury, psychological trauma, or stress,
 regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury.

(ii) An incident involving a threat or use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon, including the use of common objects as weapons, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury.

(iii) The following four workplace violence types:

(I) “Type 1 violence,” which means workplace violence committed by a person who has no legitimate business at the worksite, and includes violent acts by anyone who enters the workplace or approaches workers with the intent to commit a crime.

(II) “Type 2 violence,” which means workplace violence directed at employees by customers, clients, patients, students, inmates, or visitors.

(III) “Type 3
 violence,” which means workplace violence against an employee by a present or former employee, supervisor, or manager.

(IV) “Type 4 violence,” which means workplace violence committed in the workplace by a person who does not work there, but has or is known to have had a personal relationship with an employee.

(C) “Workplace violence” does not include lawful acts of self-defense or defense of others.

(7) “Work practice controls” means procedures and rules which are used to effectively reduce workplace violence hazards.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section applies to all employers, employees, places of employment, and employer-provided housing.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the following employers, employees, and places of employment are exempt from this section:

(A) Health care facilities, service categories, and operations covered by Section 3342 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Employers that comply with Section 3342 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) Facilities operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, if the facilities are in compliance with Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(D) Employers that are law enforcement agencies that are a “department or participating department,” as defined in Section 1001 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and that have received confirmation of
 compliance with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST) Program from the POST Executive Director in accordance with Section 1010 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations. However, an employer shall be exempt pursuant to this subparagraph only if all facilities operated by the agency are in compliance with Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) Employees teleworking from a location of the employee’s choice, which is not under the control of the employer.

(F) Places of employment where there are less than 10 employees working at the place at any given time and that are not accessible to the public, if the places are in compliance with Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the division may, by issuance
 of an order to take special action, require an employer that is exempt pursuant to paragraph (1) to comply with this section or require an employer to include employees or places of employment that are exempt pursuant to paragraph (1) in their compliance with this section.

(c) (1) (A) An employer shall establish, implement, and maintain an effective workplace violence prevention plan.

(B) The plan shall be in writing and shall be available and easily accessible to employees, authorized employee representatives, and representatives of the division at all times. The plan shall be in effect at all times and in all work areas and be specific to the hazards and corrective measures for each work area and operation. The written plan may be incorporated as a stand-alone section in the written injury and illness prevention program required by
 Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations or maintained as a separate document.

(2) The plan shall include all of the following:

(A) Names or job titles of the persons responsible for implementing the plan. If there are multiple persons responsible for the plan, their roles shall be clearly described.

(B) Effective procedures to obtain the active involvement of employees and authorized employee representatives in developing and implementing the plan, including, but not limited to, through their participation in identifying, evaluating, and correcting workplace violence hazards, in designing and implementing training, and in reporting and investigating workplace violence incidents.

(C) Methods the employer will use to coordinate
 implementation of the plan with other employers, when applicable, to ensure that those employers and employees understand their respective roles, as provided in the plan. These methods shall ensure that all employees are provided the training required by subdivision (e) and that workplace violence incidents involving any employee are reported, investigated, and recorded.

(D) Effective procedures for the employer to accept and respond to reports of workplace violence, and to prohibit retaliation against an employee who makes such a report.

(E) Effective procedures to ensure that supervisory and nonsupervisory employees comply with the plan in a manner consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(F) Effective procedures to communicate with employees
 regarding workplace violence matters, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(i) How an employee can report a violent incident, threat, or other workplace violence concern to the employer or law enforcement without fear of reprisal.

(ii) How employee concerns will be investigated as part of the employer’s responsibility in complying with subparagraph (I), and how employees will be informed of the results of the investigation and any corrective actions to be taken as part of the employer’s responsibility in complying with subparagraph (J).

(G) Effective procedures to respond to actual or potential workplace violence emergencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Effective means to alert employees of the presence,
 location, and nature of workplace violence emergencies.

(ii) Evacuation or sheltering plans that are appropriate and feasible for the worksite.

(iii) How to obtain help from staff assigned to respond to workplace violence emergencies, if any, security personnel, if any, and law enforcement.

(H) Procedures to develop and provide the training required in subdivision (e).

(I) Procedures to identify and evaluate workplace violence hazards, including, but not limited to, scheduled periodic inspections to identify unsafe conditions and work practices and employee reports and concerns. Inspections shall be conducted when the plan is first established, after each workplace violence incident, and whenever the employer is made aware of a new or previously
 unrecognized hazard.

(J) Procedures to correct workplace violence hazards identified and evaluated in subparagraph (I) in a timely manner consistent with paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(K) Procedures for postincident response and investigation.

(L) Procedures to review the effectiveness of the plan and revise the plan as needed, including, but not limited to, procedures to obtain the active involvement of employees and authorized employee representatives in reviewing the plan. The plan shall be reviewed at least annually, when a deficiency is observed or becomes apparent, and after a workplace violence incident.

(M) Procedures or other information required by the division and standards
 board as being necessary and appropriate to protect the health and safety of employees, pursuant to subdivision (h).

(d) (1) (A) The employer shall record information in a violent incident log for every workplace violence incident.

(B) Information that is recorded in the log for each incident shall be based on information solicited from the employees who experienced the workplace violence, on witness statements, and on investigation findings. The employer shall omit any element of personal identifying information sufficient to allow identification of any person involved in a violent incident, such as the person’s name, address, electronic mail address, telephone number, social security number, or other information that, alone or in combination with other publicly available information, reveals the person’s identity. The log shall be
 reviewed during the periodic reviews of the plan required in subparagraph (L) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(C) For purposes of this section, at a multiemployer worksite, the employer or employers whose employees experienced the workplace violence incident shall record the information in a violent incident log pursuant to subparagraph (A) and shall also provide a copy of that log to the controlling employer.

(2) The information recorded in the log shall include all of the following:

(A) The date, time, and location of the incident.

(B) The workplace violence type or types, as described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), involved in the incident.

(C) A detailed description of the incident.

(D) A classification of who committed the violence, including whether the perpetrator was a client or customer, family or friend of a client or customer, stranger with criminal intent, coworker, supervisor or manager, partner or spouse, parent or relative, or other perpetrator.

(E) A classification of circumstances at the time of the incident, including, but not limited to, whether the employee was completing usual job duties, working in poorly lit areas, rushed, working during a low staffing level, isolated or alone, unable to get help or assistance, working in a community setting, or working in an unfamiliar or new location.

(F) A classification of where the incident occurred, such as in the workplace, parking lot or other area outside the workplace, or other
 area.

(G) The type of incident, including, but not limited to, whether it involved any of the following:

(i) Physical attack without a weapon, including, but not limited to, biting, choking, grabbing, hair pulling, kicking, punching, slapping, pushing, pulling, scratching, or spitting.

(ii) Attack with a weapon or object, including, but not limited to, a firearm, knife, or other object.

(iii) Threat of physical force or threat of the use of a weapon or other object.

(iv) Sexual assault or threat, including, but not limited to, rape, attempted rape, physical display, or unwanted verbal or physical sexual contact.

(v) Animal
 attack.

(vi) Other.

(H) Consequences of the incident, including, but not limited to:

(i) Whether security or law enforcement was contacted and their response.

(ii) Actions taken to protect employees from a continuing threat or from any other hazards identified as a result of the incident.

(I) Information about the person completing the log, including their name, job title, and the date completed.

(e) (1) The employer shall provide effective training to employees, as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3). Training material appropriate in content and vocabulary to the educational level, literacy, and
 language of employees shall be used.

(2) The employer shall provide employees with initial training when the plan is first established, and annually thereafter, on all of the following:

(A) The employer’s plan, how to obtain a copy of the employer’s plan at no cost, and how to participate in development and implementation of the employer’s plan.

(B) The definitions and requirements of this section.

(C) How to report workplace violence incidents or concerns to the employer or law enforcement without fear of reprisal.

(D) Workplace violence hazards specific to the employees’ jobs, the corrective measures the employer has implemented, how to seek assistance to prevent or respond to violence,
 and strategies to avoid physical harm.

(E) The violent incident log required by subdivision (d) and how to obtain copies of records required by paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (f).

(F) An opportunity for interactive questions and answers with a person knowledgeable about the employer’s plan.
